Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1530
Department; federal funding; duty.

The department shall cooperate in any action necessary to obtain federal funding to carry out the Petroleum Release Remedial Action Act.

Laws 1989, LB 289, § 30.